South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5003.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 4-10-970(A)(2)(a) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (a) at least twenty fifty percent of the amount retained must be used to provide a credit against the property tax liability imposed by the municipality on parcels of owner-occupied residential property located in the municipality classified for property taxes pursuant to Section 12-43-220(c). The credit is an amount determined by multiplying the appraised value of the residence by a fraction in which the numerator is the total estimated revenue retained by the municipality allocated to the credit and the denominator is the total of the appraised value of all such property in the municipality as of January first of the applicable property tax year. For purposes of this calculation, appraised value is as defined in Section 12-37-3130(3) reduced by the limitation provided pursuant to Section 12-37-3140(B); SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----